Indiana, session 2026, SB228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-10-16-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.141-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. As used in this chapter, "land use and zoning
plan" means the land use and zoning overlay district plan adopted by
the eligible county with the formation of the district.
SECTION 2. IC 36-10-16-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.141-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) The commission may be established by the
legislative body of an eligible:
(1) county; and
(2) city;
upon the adoption of an ordinance approved by both bodies
establishing the commission.
(b) The ordinance establishing the commission shall designate the
boundaries of the Midwest continental divide district, if the legislative
bodies determine the following:
(1) The district's designation would encourage collaboration and
support development across jurisdictions.
(2) The district's efforts enhance the quality of life, create cultural
amenities, and preserve key land and natural resources in at least
one (1) eligible unit, a reservation site, and the surrounding
region.
SEA 228

2
(3) The existence of a development plan for the district that
includes the development of a trail project and that identifies the
trail project's objectives in a clearly focused and measurable
fashion.
(4) The district's designation would catalyze new developments
and attractions and improve tourism and the tourism industry in
the eligible county and Indiana.
(5) The district's efforts would enhance a state park and a state
nature preserve in the eligible county.
The commission, from time to time, may petition the legislative body
of the eligible county and eligible city, as applicable, to expand the
boundaries of the district inside the respective jurisdictions.
(c) The ordinance establishing the commission shall also:
(1) approve a land use and zoning plan for the district; and
(2) provide that any change or variance in the land use and zoning
that is:
(A) inconsistent with the land use and zoning plan; and
(B) not more than one-half (1/2) mile from a trail project
approved by the commission and the eligible county or
city, as applicable;
plan requires shall be considered consistent with the land use
and zoning plan by the approval of the commission.
(d) The commission shall notify the state budget agency in writing
promptly after the commission is established.
SEA 228

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 228